Utah statutes.
49-23-402.   Defined contribution distributions for disabled members.
For a person who is disabled and receives contributions under Subsection
49-11-404(4)(b), the disabled member may begin receiving distributions from
the defined contributions made by the participating employer on behalf of the
disabled member when the person would have been eligible to retire if the
person was covered by the defined benefit portion of the Tier II hybrid
retirement system under Part 3, Tier II Hybrid Retirement System.
